Missouri, session 2026, HB2064.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 21.750, RSMo, is repealed, to read as follows:
[21.750. 1. The general assembly hereby occupies and preempts the
entire field of legislation touching in any way firearms, components,
ammunition and supplies to the complete exclusion of any order, ordinance
or regulation by any political subdivision of this state. Any existing or future
orders, ordinances or regulations in this field are hereby and shall be null and
void except as provided in subsection 3 of this section.
2. No county, city, town, village, municipality, or other political
subdivision of this state shall adopt any order, ordinance or regulation
concerning in any way the sale, purchase, purchase delay, transfer, ownership,
use, keeping, possession, bearing, transportation, licensing, permit,
registration, taxation other than sales and compensating use taxes or other
controls on firearms, components, ammunition, and supplies except as
provided in subsection 3 of this section.
3. (1) Except as provided in subdivision (2) of this subsection, nothing
contained in this section shall prohibit any ordinance of any political
subdivision which conforms exactly with any of the provisions of sections
571.010 to 571.070, with appropriate penalty provisions, or which regulates
the open carrying of firearms readily capable of lethal use or the discharge of
firearms within a jurisdiction, provided such ordinance complies with the
provisions of section 252.243. No ordinance shall be construed to preclude the
use of a firearm in the defense of person or property, subject to the provisions
of chapter 563.
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2064 2
(2) In any jurisdiction in which the open carrying of firearms is
prohibited by ordinance, the open carrying of firearms shall not be prohibited
in accordance with the following:
(a) Any person with a valid concealed carry endorsement or permit
who is open carrying a firearm shall be required to have a valid concealed
carry endorsement or permit from this state, or a permit from another state that
is recognized by this state, in his or her possession at all times;
(b) Any person open carrying a firearm in such jurisdiction shall
display his or her concealed carry endorsement or permit upon demand of a
law enforcement officer;
(c) In the absence of any reasonable and articulable suspicion of
criminal activity, no person carrying a concealed or unconcealed firearm shall
be disarmed or physically restrained by a law enforcement officer unless under
arrest; and
(d) Any person who violates this subdivision shall be subject to the
penalty provided in section 571.121.
4. The lawful design, marketing, manufacture, distribution, or sale of
firearms or ammunition to the public is not an abnormally dangerous activity
and does not constitute a public or private nuisance.
5. No county, city, town, village or any other political subdivision nor
the state shall bring suit or have any right to recover against any firearms or
ammunition manufacturer, trade association or dealer for damages, abatement
or injunctive relief resulting from or relating to the lawful design, manufacture,
marketing, distribution, or sale of firearms or ammunition to the public. This
subsection shall apply to any suit pending as of October 12, 2003, as well as
any suit which may be brought in the future. Provided, however, that nothing
in this section shall restrict the rights of individual citizens to recover for
injury or death caused by the negligent or defective design or manufacture of
firearms or ammunition.
6. Nothing in this section shall prevent the state, a county, city, town,
village or any other political subdivision from bringing an action against a
firearms or ammunition manufacturer or dealer for breach of contract or
warranty as to firearms or ammunition purchased by the state or such political
subdivision.]
✔